Utah statutes.
7-19-3.   Waiver of procedures.

The commissioner may waive any of the procedures of Section 7-1-705 or any regulation of the department if he considers it necessary to protect the interest of depositors, creditors, and other customers of a failing or failed depository institution or failing or failed depository institution holding company in a supervisory merger or a supervisory acquisition.

